Illinois, session 104th, HB5019.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Transportation Network Providers Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 57/15)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 1, 2028)8    Sec. 15. Driver requirements. 9    (a) Prior to permitting an individual to act as a TNC 10driver on its digital platform, the TNC shall:11        (1) require the individual to submit an application to 12    the TNC or a third party on behalf of the TNC, which 13    includes information regarding his or her full legal name, 14    social security number, address, age, date of birth, 15    driver's license, driving history, motor vehicle 16    registration, automobile liability insurance, and other 17    information required by the TNC;18        (2) conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local 19    and national criminal history background check for each 20    individual applicant that shall include:21            (A) Multi-State or Multi-Jurisdictional Criminal 22        Records Locator or other similar commercial nationwide 23        database with validation (primary source search); and   HB5019- 2 -LRB104 18203 LNS 31642 b1            (B) National Sex Offenders Registry database; and2        (3) obtain and review a driving history research 3    report for the individual.4    (b) The TNC shall not permit an individual to act as a TNC 5driver on its digital platform who:6        (1) has had more than 3 moving violations in the prior 7    three-year period, or one major violation in the prior 8    three-year period including, but not limited to, 9    attempting to evade the police, reckless driving, or 10    driving on a suspended or revoked license;11        (2) has been convicted, within the past 7 years, of 12    driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, fraud, 13    sexual offenses, use of a motor vehicle to commit a 14    felony, a crime involving property damage, or theft, acts 15    of violence, or acts of terror;16        (3) is a match in the National Sex Offenders Registry 17    database;18        (4) does not possess a valid driver's license;19        (5) does not possess proof of registration for the 20    motor vehicle used to provide TNC services;21        (6) does not possess proof of automobile liability 22    insurance for the motor vehicle used to provide TNC 23    services; or24        (7) is under 19 years of age.25    (c) An individual who submits an application under 26paragraph (1) of subsection (a) that contains false or   HB5019- 3 -LRB104 18203 LNS 31642 b1incomplete information shall be guilty of a petty offense.2    (d) A school TNC shall, in addition to the requirements 3set forth in this Section:4        (1) train each driver providing school TNC services in 5    safe driving practices, education on special 6    considerations for transporting students with 7    disabilities, emergency preparedness, and safe pick-up and 8    drop-off procedures;9        (2) ensure that each driver providing school TNC 10    services:11            (A) is 23 years of age or older; and12            (B) has a minimum of 3 years of driving 13        experience;14        (3) not permit an individual to provide school TNC 15    services who:16            (A) is listed in the Statewide Sex Offender 17        Database;18            (B) is listed in the Statewide Murderer and 19        Violent Offender Against Youth Database; or20            (C) has not completed a fingerprint-based criminal 21        history records check, either pursuant to federal or 22        State law, for unsupervised access to minors or under 23        Section 10-21.9 of the School Code;24        (4) use global position system monitoring that 25    provides end-to-end visibility into the ride for the TNC, 26    the student's legal guardian, and authorized school   HB5019- 4 -LRB104 18203 LNS 31642 b1    personnel;2        (5) use an integrated telematics solution that sends, 3    receives, and stores telemetry data from school TNC 4    drivers, including, but not limited to, cell phone use, 5    speeding, hard turning, hard braking, hard acceleration, 6    and crash detection, to detect driving behavior during 7    each ride; and8        (6) provide a report, in consultation with a school or 9    school district that has used the TNC services, detailing 10    the impact of the program to the Transportation Vehicles & 11    Safety Committee of the House of Representatives and the 12    Transportation Commission of the Senate within 90 days of 13    the conclusion of the first school year of the pilot 14    program, and within 90 days of the final year of the pilot 15    program.16    (e) This Act, a municipal ordinance regulating 17transportation network providers under Section 32, and any 18contract between a school or school district and the TNC shall 19exclusively govern the services provided under this Section. A 20driver is not required to obtain any additional State-issued 21licensure or permit, including a school bus driver permit.22    (f) As used in this Section, "school TNC" means a TNC that 23receives remuneration from a school or school district to 24provide services for students to or from school, 25school-related activities, or school-sanctioned activities. 26(Source: P.A. 100-738, eff. 8-7-18. Reenacted by 101-660, eff.   HB5019- 5 -LRB104 18203 LNS 31642 b14-2-21.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.